Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-254
Ordinances; revision; publication.

A primary city may provide for the revision of the ordinances from time to time, and for their publication in pamphlet or book form, with or without the statutes relative to cities of the primary class.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LIV, p. 141;

R.S.1913, § 4464;

C.S.1922, § 3849;

C.S.1929, § 15-252;

R.S.1943, § 15-254.